Illinois, session 104th, HB4905.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963 is 5amended by changing Sections 110-1 and 110-6.1 as follows: 6    (725 ILCS 5/110-1)  (from Ch. 38, par. 110-1)7    Sec. 110-1. Definitions. As used in this Article: 8    (a) (Blank).9    (b) "Sureties" encompasses the nonmonetary requirements 10set by the court as conditions for release either before or 11after conviction.12    (c) The phrase "for which a sentence of imprisonment, 13without conditional and revocable release, shall be imposed by 14law as a consequence of conviction" means an offense for which 15a sentence of imprisonment in the Department of Corrections, 16without probation, periodic imprisonment or conditional 17discharge, is required by law upon conviction.18    (d)(Blank).19    (e) "Protective order" means any order of protection 20issued under Section 112A-14 of this Code or the Illinois 21Domestic Violence Act of 1986, a stalking no contact order 22issued under Section 80 of the Stalking No Contact Order Act, 23or a civil no contact order issued under Section 213 of the   HB4905- 2 -LRB104 17022 RLC 30437 b1Civil No Contact Order Act.2    (f) "Willful flight" means intentional conduct with a 3purpose to elude arrest, thwart the judicial process, or to 4avoid prosecution. Isolated instances of nonappearance in 5court alone are not evidence of the risk of willful flight. 6Reoccurrence and patterns of intentional conduct to evade 7prosecution, along with any affirmative steps to communicate 8or remedy any such missed court date, may be considered as 9factors in assessing future intent to evade prosecution. 10(Source: P.A. 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-1104, eff. 1-1-23; 11103-154, eff. 6-30-23.) 12    (725 ILCS 5/110-6.1)  (from Ch. 38, par. 110-6.1)13    Sec. 110-6.1. Denial of pretrial release. 14    (a) Upon verified petition by the State, the court shall 15hold a hearing and may deny a defendant pretrial release only 16if:17        (1) the defendant is charged with a felony offense 18    other than a forcible felony for which, based on the 19    charge or the defendant's criminal history, a sentence of 20    imprisonment, without probation, periodic imprisonment, or 21    conditional discharge, is required by law upon conviction, 22    and it is alleged that the defendant's pretrial release 23    poses a real and present threat to the safety of any person 24    or persons or the community, based on the specific 25    articulable facts of the case;  HB4905- 3 -LRB104 17022 RLC 30437 b1        (1.5) the defendant's pretrial release poses a real 2    and present threat to the safety of any person or persons 3    or the community, based on the specific articulable facts 4    of the case, and the defendant is charged with a forcible 5    felony, which as used in this Section, means treason, 6    first degree murder, second degree murder, predatory 7    criminal sexual assault of a child, aggravated criminal 8    sexual assault, criminal sexual assault, armed robbery, 9    aggravated robbery, robbery, burglary where there is use 10    of force against another person, residential burglary, 11    home invasion, vehicular invasion, aggravated arson, 12    arson, aggravated kidnaping, kidnaping, aggravated battery 13    resulting in great bodily harm or permanent disability or 14    disfigurement, or any other felony which involves the 15    threat of or infliction of great bodily harm or permanent 16    disability or disfigurement; 17        (2) the defendant is charged with stalking or 18    aggravated stalking, and it is alleged that the 19    defendant's pre-trial release poses a real and present 20    threat to the safety of a victim of the alleged offense, 21    and denial of release is necessary to prevent fulfillment 22    of the threat upon which the charge is based;23        (3) the defendant is charged with a violation of an 24    order of protection issued under Section 112A-14 of this 25    Code or Section 214 of the Illinois Domestic Violence Act 26    of 1986, a stalking no contact order under Section 80 of   HB4905- 4 -LRB104 17022 RLC 30437 b1    the Stalking No Contact Order Act, or a civil no contact 2    order under Section 213 of the Civil No Contact Order Act, 3    and it is alleged that the defendant's pretrial release 4    poses a real and present threat to the safety of any person 5    or persons or the community, based on the specific 6    articulable facts of the case;7        (4) the defendant is charged with domestic battery or 8    aggravated domestic battery under Section 12-3.2 or 12-3.3 9    of the Criminal Code of 2012 and it is alleged that the 10    defendant's pretrial release poses a real and present 11    threat to the safety of any person or persons or the 12    community, based on the specific articulable facts of the 13    case;14        (5) the defendant is charged with any offense under 15    Article 11 of the Criminal Code of 2012, except for 16    Sections 11-14, 11-14.1, 11-18, 11-20, 11-30, 11-35, 17    11-40, and 11-45 of the Criminal Code of 2012, or similar 18    provisions of the Criminal Code of 1961 and it is alleged 19    that the defendant's pretrial release poses a real and 20    present threat to the safety of any person or persons or 21    the community, based on the specific articulable facts of 22    the case; 23        (6) the defendant is charged with any of the following 24    offenses under the Criminal Code of 2012, and it is 25    alleged that the defendant's pretrial release poses a real 26    and present threat to the safety of any person or persons   HB4905- 5 -LRB104 17022 RLC 30437 b1    or the community, based on the specific articulable facts 2    of the case:3            (A) Section 24-1.2 (aggravated discharge of a 4        firearm);5            (B) Section 24-1.2-5 (aggravated discharge of a 6        machine gun or a firearm equipped with a device 7        designed or used for silencing the report of a 8        firearm);9            (C) Section 24-1.5 (reckless discharge of a 10        firearm);11            (D) Section 24-1.7 (unlawful possession of a 12        firearm by a repeat felony offender);13            (E) Section 24-2.2 (manufacture, sale, or transfer 14        of bullets or shells represented to be armor piercing 15        bullets, dragon's breath shotgun shells, bolo shells, 16        or flechette shells);17            (F) Section 24-3 (unlawful sale or delivery of 18        firearms);19            (G) Section 24-3.3 (unlawful sale or delivery of 20        firearms on the premises of any school);21            (H) Section 24-34 (unlawful sale of firearms by 22        liquor license);23            (I) Section 24-3.5 (unlawful purchase of a 24        firearm);25            (J) Section 24-3A (gunrunning);26            (K) Section 24-3B (firearms trafficking);  HB4905- 6 -LRB104 17022 RLC 30437 b1            (L) Section 10-9 (b) (involuntary servitude);2            (M) Section 10-9 (c) (involuntary sexual servitude 3        of a minor);4            (N) Section 10-9(d) (trafficking in persons);5            (O) Non-probationable violations: (i) unlawful 6        possession of weapons by felons or persons in the 7        Custody of the Department of Corrections facilities 8        (Section 24-1.1), (ii) aggravated unlawful possession 9        of a weapon (Section 24-1.6), or (iii) aggravated 10        possession of a stolen firearm (Section 24-3.9); 11            (P) Section 9-3 (reckless homicide and involuntary 12        manslaughter);13            (Q) Section 19-3 (residential burglary);14            (R) Section 10-5 (child abduction);15            (S) Felony violations of Section 12C-5 (child 16        endangerment);17            (T) Section 12-7.1 (hate crime); 18            (U) Section 10-3.1 (aggravated unlawful 19        restraint); 20            (V) Section 12-9 (threatening a public official); 21            (W) Subdivision (f)(1) of Section 12-3.05 22        (aggravated battery with a deadly weapon other than by 23        discharge of a firearm); 24        (6.5) the defendant is charged with any of the 25    following offenses, and it is alleged that the defendant's 26    pretrial release poses a real and present threat to the   HB4905- 7 -LRB104 17022 RLC 30437 b1    safety of any person or persons or the community, based on 2    the specific articulable facts of the case: 3            (A) Felony violations of Sections 3.01, 3.02, or 4        3.03 of the Humane Care for Animals Act (cruel 5        treatment, aggravated cruelty, and animal torture);6            (B) Subdivision (d)(1)(B) of Section 11-501 of the 7        Illinois Vehicle Code (aggravated driving under the 8        influence while operating a school bus with 9        passengers);10            (C) Subdivision (d)(1)(C) of Section 11-501 of the 11        Illinois Vehicle Code (aggravated driving under the 12        influence causing great bodily harm);13            (D) Subdivision (d)(1)(D) of Section 11-501 of the 14        Illinois Vehicle Code (aggravated driving under the 15        influence after a previous reckless homicide 16        conviction);17            (E) Subdivision (d)(1)(F) of Section 11-501 of the 18        Illinois Vehicle Code (aggravated driving under the 19        influence leading to death); or20            (F) Subdivision (d)(1)(J) of Section 11-501 of the 21        Illinois Vehicle Code (aggravated driving under the 22        influence that resulted in bodily harm to a child 23        under the age of 16);24        (7) the defendant is charged with an attempt to commit 25    any charge listed in paragraphs (1) through (6.5), and it 26    is alleged that the defendant's pretrial release poses a   HB4905- 8 -LRB104 17022 RLC 30437 b1    real and present threat to the safety of any person or 2    persons or the community, based on the specific 3    articulable facts of the case; or 4        (8) the person has a high likelihood of willful flight 5    to avoid prosecution and is charged with:6            (A) Any felony described in subdivisions (a)(1) 7        through (a)(7) of this Section; or8            (B) A felony offense other than a Class 4 offense. 9    (b) If the charged offense is a felony, as part of the 10detention hearing, the court shall determine whether there is 11probable cause the defendant has committed an offense, unless 12a hearing pursuant to Section 109-3 of this Code has already 13been held or a grand jury has returned a true bill of 14indictment against the defendant. If there is a finding of no 15probable cause, the defendant shall be released. No such 16finding is necessary if the defendant is charged with a 17misdemeanor.18    (c) Timing of petition. 19        (1) A petition may be filed without prior notice to 20    the defendant at the first appearance before a judge, or 21    within the 21 calendar days, except as provided in Section 22    110-6, after arrest and release of the defendant upon 23    reasonable notice to defendant; provided that while such 24    petition is pending before the court, the defendant if 25    previously released shall not be detained.26        (2) Upon filing, the court shall immediately hold a   HB4905- 9 -LRB104 17022 RLC 30437 b1    hearing on the petition unless a continuance is requested. 2    If a continuance is requested and granted, the hearing 3    shall be held within 48 hours of the defendant's first 4    appearance if the defendant is charged with first degree 5    murder or a Class X, Class 1, Class 2, or Class 3 felony, 6    and within 24 hours if the defendant is charged with a 7    Class 4 or misdemeanor offense. The Court may deny or 8    grant the request for continuance. If the court decides to 9    grant the continuance, the Court retains the discretion to 10    detain or release the defendant in the time between the 11    filing of the petition and the hearing.12    (d) Contents of petition.13        (1) The petition shall be verified by the State and 14    shall state the grounds upon which it contends the 15    defendant should be denied pretrial release, including the 16    real and present threat to the safety of any person or 17    persons or the community, based on the specific 18    articulable facts or flight risk, as appropriate.19        (2) If the State seeks to file a second or subsequent 20    petition under this Section, the State shall be required 21    to present a verified application setting forth in detail 22    any new facts not known or obtainable at the time of the 23    filing of the previous petition.24    (e) Eligibility: All defendants shall be presumed eligible 25for pretrial release, and the State shall bear the burden of 26proving by clear and convincing evidence that:  HB4905- 10 -LRB104 17022 RLC 30437 b1        (1) the proof is evident or the presumption great that 2    the defendant has committed an offense listed in 3    subsection (a), and4        (2) for offenses listed in paragraphs (1) through (7) 5    of subsection (a), the defendant poses a real and present 6    threat to the safety of any person or persons or the 7    community, based on the specific articulable facts of the 8    case, by conduct which may include, but is not limited to, 9    a forcible felony, the obstruction of justice, 10    intimidation, injury, or abuse as defined by paragraph (1) 11    of Section 103 of the Illinois Domestic Violence Act of 12    1986, and13        (3) no condition or combination of conditions set 14    forth in subsection (b) of Section 110-10 of this Article 15    can mitigate (i) the real and present threat to the safety 16    of any person or persons or the community, based on the 17    specific articulable facts of the case, for offenses 18    listed in paragraphs (1) through (7) of subsection (a), or 19    (ii) the defendant's willful flight for offenses listed in 20    paragraph (8) of subsection (a), and21        (4) for offenses under subsection (b) of Section 407 22    of the Illinois Controlled Substances Act that are subject 23    to paragraph (1) of subsection (a), no condition or 24    combination of conditions set forth in subsection (b) of 25    Section 110-10 of this Article can mitigate the real and 26    present threat to the safety of any person or persons or   HB4905- 11 -LRB104 17022 RLC 30437 b1    the community, based on the specific articulable facts of 2    the case, and the defendant poses a serious risk to not 3    appear in court as required.4    (f) Conduct of the hearings.5        (1) Prior to the hearing, the State shall tender to 6    the defendant copies of the defendant's criminal history 7    available, any written or recorded statements, and the 8    substance of any oral statements made by any person, if 9    relied upon by the State in its petition, and any police 10    reports in the prosecutor's possession at the time of the 11    hearing.12        (2) The State or defendant may present evidence at the 13    hearing by way of proffer based upon reliable information.14        (3) The defendant has the right to be represented by 15    counsel, and if he or she is indigent, to have counsel 16    appointed for him or her. The defendant shall have the 17    opportunity to testify, to present witnesses on his or her 18    own behalf, and to cross-examine any witnesses that are 19    called by the State. Defense counsel shall be given 20    adequate opportunity to confer with the defendant before 21    any hearing at which conditions of release or the 22    detention of the defendant are to be considered, with an 23    accommodation for a physical condition made to facilitate 24    attorney/client consultation. If defense counsel needs to 25    confer or consult with the defendant during any hearing 26    conducted via a 2-way audio-visual communication system,   HB4905- 12 -LRB104 17022 RLC 30437 b1    such consultation shall not be recorded and shall be 2    undertaken consistent with constitutional protections. 3        (3.5) A hearing at which pretrial release may be 4    denied must be conducted in person (and not by way of 2-way 5    audio visual communication) unless the accused waives the 6    right to be present physically in court, the court 7    determines that the physical health and safety of any 8    person necessary to the proceedings would be endangered by 9    appearing in court, or the chief judge of the circuit 10    orders use of that system due to operational challenges in 11    conducting the hearing in person. Such operational 12    challenges must be documented and approved by the chief 13    judge of the circuit, and a plan to address the challenges 14    through reasonable efforts must be presented and approved 15    by the Administrative Office of the Illinois Courts every 16    6 months. 17        (4) If the defense seeks to compel the complaining 18    witness to testify as a witness in its favor, it shall 19    petition the court for permission. When the ends of 20    justice so require, the court may exercise its discretion 21    and compel the appearance of a complaining witness. The 22    court shall state on the record reasons for granting a 23    defense request to compel the presence of a complaining 24    witness only on the issue of the defendant's pretrial 25    detention. In making a determination under this Section, 26    the court shall state on the record the reason for   HB4905- 13 -LRB104 17022 RLC 30437 b1    granting a defense request to compel the presence of a 2    complaining witness, and only grant the request if the 3    court finds by clear and convincing evidence that the 4    defendant will be materially prejudiced if the complaining 5    witness does not appear. Cross-examination of a 6    complaining witness at the pretrial detention hearing for 7    the purpose of impeaching the witness' credibility is 8    insufficient reason to compel the presence of the witness. 9    In deciding whether to compel the appearance of a 10    complaining witness, the court shall be considerate of the 11    emotional and physical well-being of the witness. The 12    pre-trial detention hearing is not to be used for purposes 13    of discovery, and the post arraignment rules of discovery 14    do not apply. The State shall tender to the defendant, 15    prior to the hearing, copies, if any, of the defendant's 16    criminal history, if available, and any written or 17    recorded statements and the substance of any oral 18    statements made by any person, if in the State's 19    Attorney's possession at the time of the hearing. 20        (5) The rules concerning the admissibility of evidence 21    in criminal trials do not apply to the presentation and 22    consideration of information at the hearing. At the trial 23    concerning the offense for which the hearing was conducted 24    neither the finding of the court nor any transcript or 25    other record of the hearing shall be admissible in the 26    State's case-in-chief, but shall be admissible for   HB4905- 14 -LRB104 17022 RLC 30437 b1    impeachment, or as provided in Section 115-10.1 of this 2    Code, or in a perjury proceeding.3        (6) The defendant may not move to suppress evidence or 4    a confession, however, evidence that proof of the charged 5    crime may have been the result of an unlawful search or 6    seizure, or both, or through improper interrogation, is 7    relevant in assessing the weight of the evidence against 8    the defendant.9        (7) Decisions regarding release, conditions of 10    release, and detention prior to trial must be 11    individualized, and no single factor or standard may be 12    used exclusively to order detention. Risk assessment tools 13    may not be used as the sole basis to deny pretrial release. 14    (g) Factors to be considered in making a determination of 15dangerousness. The court may, in determining whether the 16defendant poses a real and present threat to the safety of any 17person or persons or the community, based on the specific 18articulable facts of the case, consider, but shall not be 19limited to, evidence or testimony concerning:20        (1) The nature and circumstances of any offense 21    charged, including whether the offense is a crime of 22    violence, involving a weapon, or a sex offense.23        (2) The history and characteristics of the defendant 24    including:25            (A) Any evidence of the defendant's prior criminal 26        history indicative of violent, abusive, or assaultive   HB4905- 15 -LRB104 17022 RLC 30437 b1        behavior, or lack of such behavior. Such evidence may 2        include testimony or documents received in juvenile 3        proceedings, criminal, quasi-criminal, civil 4        commitment, domestic relations, or other proceedings.5            (B) Any evidence of the defendant's psychological, 6        psychiatric or other similar social history which 7        tends to indicate a violent, abusive, or assaultive 8        nature, or lack of any such history.9        (3) The identity of any person or persons to whose 10    safety the defendant is believed to pose a threat, and the 11    nature of the threat.12        (4) Any statements made by, or attributed to the 13    defendant, together with the circumstances surrounding 14    them.15        (5) The age and physical condition of the defendant.16        (6) The age and physical condition of any victim or 17    complaining witness. 18        (7) Whether the defendant is known to possess or have 19    access to any weapon or weapons.20        (8) Whether, at the time of the current offense or any 21    other offense or arrest, the defendant was on probation, 22    parole, aftercare release, mandatory supervised release, 23    or other release from custody pending trial, sentencing, 24    appeal, or completion of sentence for an offense under 25    federal or State law.26        (9) Any other factors, including those listed in   HB4905- 16 -LRB104 17022 RLC 30437 b1    Section 110-5 of this Article deemed by the court to have a 2    reasonable bearing upon the defendant's propensity or 3    reputation for violent, abusive, or assaultive behavior, 4    or lack of such behavior.5    (h) Detention order. The court shall, in any order for 6detention:7        (1) make a written finding summarizing the court's 8    reasons for concluding that the defendant should be denied 9    pretrial release, including why less restrictive 10    conditions would not avoid a real and present threat to 11    the safety of any person or persons or the community, 12    based on the specific articulable facts of the case, or 13    prevent the defendant's willful flight from prosecution;14        (2) direct that the defendant be committed to the 15    custody of the sheriff for confinement in the county jail 16    pending trial;17        (3) direct that the defendant be given a reasonable 18    opportunity for private consultation with counsel, and for 19    communication with others of his or her choice by 20    visitation, mail and telephone; and21        (4) direct that the sheriff deliver the defendant as 22    required for appearances in connection with court 23    proceedings.24    (i) Detention. If the court enters an order for the 25detention of the defendant pursuant to subsection (e) of this 26Section, the defendant shall be brought to trial on the   HB4905- 17 -LRB104 17022 RLC 30437 b1offense for which he is detained within 90 days after the date 2on which the order for detention was entered. If the defendant 3is not brought to trial within the 90-day period required by 4the preceding sentence, he shall not be denied pretrial 5release. In computing the 90-day period, the court shall omit 6any period of delay resulting from a continuance granted at 7the request of the defendant and any period of delay resulting 8from a continuance granted at the request of the State with 9good cause shown pursuant to Section 103-5.10    (i-5) At each subsequent appearance of the defendant 11before the court, the judge must find that continued detention 12is necessary to avoid a real and present threat to the safety 13of any person or persons or the community, based on the 14specific articulable facts of the case, or to prevent the 15defendant's willful flight from prosecution. 16    (j) Rights of the defendant. The defendant shall be 17entitled to appeal any order entered under this Section 18denying his or her pretrial release.19    (k) Appeal. The State may appeal any order entered under 20this Section denying any motion for denial of pretrial 21release.22    (l) Presumption of innocence. Nothing in this Section 23shall be construed as modifying or limiting in any way the 24defendant's presumption of innocence in further criminal 25proceedings.26    (m) Interest of victims.   HB4905- 18 -LRB104 17022 RLC 30437 b1        (1) Crime victims shall be given notice by the State's 2    Attorney's office of this hearing as required in paragraph 3    (1) of subsection (b) of Section 4.5 of the Rights of Crime 4    Victims and Witnesses Act and shall be informed of their 5    opportunity at this hearing to obtain a protective order. 6        (2) If the defendant is denied pretrial release, the 7    court may impose a no contact provision with the victim or 8    other interested party that shall be enforced while the 9    defendant remains in custody. 10(Source: P.A. 103-822, eff. 1-1-25; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25.)